District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.15

Penalties.

Any director, officer, manager, agent, or employee of an eligible financial institution who knowingly violates a provision of this subchapter may, upon conviction, be fined not less than $500 nor more than $2,000.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
This section is referenced in § 47-351.12.
1981 Ed., § 47-351.15.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.